Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.08.110

Internet trust business.

(1) A person engaged in trust business in this state by use of the internet is subject to regulation by the department under this title, unless it is:

(a) An out-of-state trust institution approved under chapter 30B.38 RCW or acting under authority of RCW 30B.72.010; or

(b) An exempt person under RCW 30B.04.040.

(2) The director may adopt rules specific to the regulation of internet trust businesses in the interest of protecting Washington state citizens.

[ 2014 c 37 s 332.]